Hawaii statutes.
§53-4 Removal of members. Any member
of a redevelopment agency may be removed for any inefficiency, neglect of duty,
or misconduct in office by the mayor with the approval of the council. [L 1949,
c 379, pt of §4; am L 1955, c 271, pt of §1(e); RL 1955, §143-5; am L 1957, c
64, §3; HRS §53-4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next